Nebraska, session 109, LB1249.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 48-3802, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-3802 For purposes of the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces
Act:
(1) Department means the Department of Labor;
(2) Employ means to permit to work by an employer pursuant to an
employment relationship;
(3) Employee means any individual employed by an employer, but does
not include:
(a) An individual owner-operator;
(b) An independent contractor;
(c) An individual who works in Nebraska for fewer than eighty hours
in a calendar year;
(d) An individual who is employed in agricultural employment of a
seasonal or other temporary nature;
(e) An "employee" as defined by 45 U.S.C. 351(d) who is subject to
the federal Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, 45 U.S.C. 351 et seq.;
or
(f) An individual under sixteen years of age; or
(g) An individual with any amount of an ownership interest in an
employer;
(4)(a) Employer means any individual, partnership, limited liability
company, association, corporation, business trust, legal representative,
or organized group of persons who employs eleven or more employees.
(b) Employer does not include the United States, or the State of
Nebraska or its agencies, departments, or political subdivisions, any
corporation which operates a private, parochial, or denominational
elementary or secondary school which fulfills the applicable
accreditation or approval requirements established by the State Board of
Education pursuant to section 79-318, or any private postsecondary
institution;
-2-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
(5) Family member means:
(a) Any of the following, regardless of age: A biological, adopted,
or foster child, a stepchild, a legal ward, or a child to whom the
employee stands in loco parentis;
(b) A biological, foster, step, or adoptive parent or a legal
guardian of an employee or an employee's spouse;
(c) A person who stood in loco parentis to the employee or the
employee's spouse when the employee or employee's spouse was a minor
child;
(d) A person to whom the employee is legally married under the laws
of any state;
(e) A grandparent, grandchild, or sibling, whether of a biological,
foster, adoptive, or step relationship, of the employee or the employee's
spouse; or
(f) Any other individual related by blood to the employee or whose
close association with the employee is the equivalent of a family
relationship;
(6) Health care professional means any person licensed under any
federal or state law to provide medical or emergency services;
(7) Paid sick time means time that is compensated at the same hourly
rate and with the same benefits, including health care benefits, as the
employee typically earns during hours worked and that is provided by an
employer to an employee for the purposes described in section 48-3804,
and in no case shall the amount of this hourly rate be less than that
provided under section 48-1203. Notwithstanding the foregoing, for
employees paid on a commission, piece-rate, mileage, or fee-for-service
basis, paid sick time means time that is compensated at an hourly rate
determined by the employer using the average weekly rate calculation
under section 48-126, which shall then be reduced to an hourly rate based
on a forty-hour workweek, and that is provided by an employer to an
employee for the purposes described in section 48-3804. Paid sick time
-3-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
includes time made available to employees for purposes including, but not
limited to, the purposes described in section 48-3804 under a paid leave
policy described in subsection (7) of section 48-3803;
(8) Public health emergency means a declaration or proclamation
related to a public health threat, risk, disaster, or emergency that is
made or issued by a federal, state, or local official with the authority
to make or issue such a declaration or proclamation;
(9) Retaliatory personnel action means a denial of any right
guaranteed under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act and any
threat, discharge, suspension, demotion, reduction of hours or pay, or
other adverse action against an employee for exercising or attempting to
exercise any right guaranteed in the Nebraska Healthy Families and
Workplaces Act;
(10)(a) Small business means an employer with at least eleven but
fewer than twenty employees during a given week, including full-time,
part-time, or temporary employees.
(b) Small business does not include an employer that maintained
twenty or more employees on its payroll in each of twenty or more
calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar year; and
(11) Year means a regular and consecutive twelve-month period as
determined by the employer.
Sec. 2. Section 48-3803, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-3803 (1) All employees shall begin accruing paid sick time after
eighty hours of consecutive employment, at which point employees shall
then accrue a minimum of one hour of paid sick time for every thirty
hours worked. Unless the employer selects a higher limit, this section
does not entitle an employee to earn or use more than:
(a) Forty hours of paid sick time in a year for an employee of a
small business; or
(b) Fifty-six hours of paid sick time in a year for an employee of
-4-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
an employer that is not a small business.
(2) Employees who are exempt from overtime requirements under 29
U.S.C. 213(a)(1) or 29 U.S.C. 213(b)(1) of the federal Fair Labor
Standards Act, 29 U.S.C. 201 et seq., shall be assumed to work forty
hours in each workweek for purposes of paid sick time accrual unless
their typical workweek is less than forty hours, in which case paid sick
time accrues based upon that typical workweek.
(3) Paid sick time requirements provided under the Nebraska Healthy
Families and Workplaces Act shall begin October 1, 2025. An employee
shall be entitled to use paid sick time as it is accrued. An employer may
provide all paid sick time that an employee is expected to accrue in a
year at the beginning of the year.
(4) Paid sick time provided to an employee on or after January 1,
2025, and before October 1, 2025, shall be counted toward an employer's
obligations under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act for
calendar year 2025.
(5) Accrued paid sick time shall be carried over to the following
year, except that a . A small business is not required to permit an
employee to carryover or use more than forty hours of paid sick time per
year, and other employers are not required to permit an employee to
carryover or use more than fifty-six hours of paid sick time per year.
(6) In lieu of carryover of unused paid sick time provided pursuant
to this section from one year to the next, an employer may pay an
employee for unused paid sick time provided pursuant to this section at
the end of a year and provide the employee with an amount of paid sick
time that meets or exceeds the requirements of subsections (1) and (3) of
this section that is available for the employee's immediate use at the
beginning of the subsequent year.
(7) Any employer with a paid leave policy, such as a paid time off
policy, who makes available an amount of paid leave that equals or
exceeds the requirements of the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces
-5-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
Act and that may be used as paid sick time in accordance with section
48-3804 is not required to provide additional paid sick time under the
act and is not obligated to allow an employee to accrue or carryover
benefits beyond the employer's existing paid leave policy.
(8) At its discretion, an employer may loan paid sick time to an
employee in advance of accrual by such employee.
(9) If an employee is transferred to a separate division, entity, or
location, but remains employed by the same employer, the employee is
entitled to all paid sick time accrued at the prior division, entity, or
location and is entitled to use all paid sick time as provided in the
Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces Act. When there is a separation
from employment and the employee is rehired within twelve months of
separation by the same employer, previously accrued paid sick time that
had not been used or paid out to the employee shall be reinstated. The
employee shall be entitled to use accrued paid sick time and accrue
additional paid sick time at the recommencement of employment.
(10) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require employers
to pay an employee for unused paid sick time upon the employee's
separation from employment.
Sec. 3. Section 48-3806, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
48-3806 (1) Employers shall give employees written notice of the
following at the commencement of employment or by September 15, 2025,
whichever is later: That beginning October 1, 2025, employees are
entitled to paid sick time; the amount of paid sick time; the terms of
its use guaranteed under the Nebraska Healthy Families and Workplaces
Act; that retaliatory personnel action against employees who request or
use paid sick time is prohibited; that each employee has the right to
file a suit or complaint if paid sick time as required by the act is
denied by the employer or the employee is subjected to retaliatory
personnel action for requesting or taking paid sick time; and the contact
-6-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
information for the department where questions about rights and
responsibilities under the act can be answered.
(2) The notices required in subsection (1) of this section shall be
provided in:
(a) English; and
(b) Any language that is the first language spoken by at least five
percent of the employer's workforce if the department has provided a
model notice in such language.
(3) The amount of paid sick time available to the employee, the
amount of paid sick time taken by the employee to date in the year, and
the amount of pay the employee has received as paid sick time shall be
recorded in, or on an attachment to, the employee's regular paycheck.
(4) Employers shall display a poster that contains the information
required in subsection (1) of this section in a conspicuous and
accessible place in each establishment where such employees are employed.
If an employer does not maintain a physical workplace or an employee
teleworks or performs work through a web-based or app-based platform, the
employer shall provide notice of such information via electronic
communication or a conspicuous posting in the web-based or app-based
platform. The poster displayed shall be in:
(a) English; and
(b) Any language that is the first language spoken by at least five
percent of the employer's workforce if the department has provided
posters in such language.
(5) The department shall create and make available to employers, in
all languages spoken by at least five percent of Nebraska's workforce and
any language deemed appropriate by the department, model notices and
posters that contain the information required under subsection (1) of
this section and for employers' use in complying with subsections (1) and
(4) of this section.
Sec. 4. Original sections 48-3802, 48-3803, and 48-3806, Revised
-7-

LB1249 LB1249
2026 2026
Statutes Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-8-